test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-reenaz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - rēnaz: # Noun 176 'eng /est vankri küljelaud/fin' - full paradigm
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Nom: rēnaz
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Gen: reinõ
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Par: rēnazt
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Dat: reinõn
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Ins: reinõks
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Ill: [reinõ, reinõz]
     rēnaz+N+Sg+Ela: reinõst
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Nom: reinõd
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Gen: reinõd
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Par: reinidi
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Dat: reinõdõn
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Ins: reinõdõks
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Ill: reiniž
     rēnaz+N+Pl+Ela: reinist
